Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-105.3, as
last amended by Section 42, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 6-105.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-105.3. A. In addition to the licenses to operate
motor vehicles, Service Oklahoma may issue cards to Oklahoma
residents for purposes of identification only. The identification
cards shall be issued, renewed, replaced, canceled and denied in the
same manner as driver licenses in this state. A licensee whose
record reflects a notation of the person’s proof of legal presence,
Req. No. 10328 Page 1

veri fied by the U.S. Department of Homeland Security, or proof of
U.S. citizenship, may obtain a REAL ID Compliant Identification Card
or a Noncompliant Identification Card from a licensed operator or
Service Oklahoma, regardless of the status of the license held by
the licensee. Provided, the licensee must comply with all REAL ID
documentation requirements to obtain a REAL ID Compliant
Identification Card. A person shall not apply for or possess more
than one state-issued or territory-issued REAL ID Compliant
Identification Card pursuant to the provisions of Section 6-101 of
this title.
The application for an identification card by any person under
the age of eighteen (18) years shall be signed and verified by a
custodial legal parent or legal guardian, either in person before a
person authorized to administer oaths or electronically if
completing an online application, or a notarized affidavit signed by
a custodial legal parent or legal guardian submitted before a person
authorized to administer oaths by the person under the age of
eighteen (18) years with the application. Except as otherwise
provided in this section, the identification cards shall be valid
for a period of either four (4) years from the month of issuance or
eight (8) years from the month of issuance; however, the
identification cards issued to persons sixty-five (65) years of age
or older shall be valid indefinitely from the month of issuance.

Req. No. 10328 Page 2

B. 1. The Department of Corrections shall coordinate with
Service Oklahoma to provide REAL ID Noncompliant Identification
Cards to all inmates who do not have a current state-issued
identification card or driver license upon their release from
custody. The identification cards shall be issued, replaced,
canceled and denied in the same manner as driver licenses in this
state.
2. Service Oklahoma shall allow the use of a certified copy of
a birth certificate coupled with a Department of Corrections-issued
consolidated record card to serve as a valid form of photo
identification documentation to obtain a REAL ID Noncompliant
Identification Card.
3. REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Cards issued with a
consolidated record card from the Department of Corrections for
inmates shall be valid for a period of four (4) years from the month
of issuance for an allowable fee to be determined by Service
Oklahoma and are nonrenewable and nontransferable.
4. The fee charged for the issuance or replacement of a REAL ID
Noncompliant Identification Card pursuant to this subsection shall
be deposited in the Department of Public Safety Revolving Fund
through October 31, 2022. Beginning November 1, 2022, this fee
shall be deposited in the Service Oklahoma Revolving Fund.
Provided, however, REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Cards issued
to individuals required to register pursuant to the Sex Offenders
Req. No. 10328 Page 3

Regi stration Act shall only be valid for a period of one (1) year.
No person sixty-five (65) years of age or older shall be charged a
fee for a REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Card.
5. Service Oklahoma is authorized to promulgate rules and
procedures to implement the provisions of this subsection.
C. No person shall hold more than one state-issued or
territory-issued REAL ID Compliant Driver License or REAL ID
Compliant Identification Card, as defined in subsection G of Section
6-101 of this title. Service Oklahoma shall not issue a REAL ID
Compliant Identification Card to any applicant who has been
previously issued a REAL ID Compliant Driver License or REAL ID
Compliant Identification Card unless such license or identification
card has been surrendered to the Department Service Oklahoma by the
applicant. Service Oklahoma may promulgate rules related to the
issuance of replacement REAL ID Compliant Identification Cards in
the event of loss or theft.
D. The fee charged for the issuance or renewal of a REAL ID
Compliant Identification Card shall be Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00)
for a 4-year card and Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for an 8-year card.
The fee charged for the issuance or renewal of a REAL ID
Noncompliant Identification Card pursuant to this section shall be
Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for a 4-year card and Fifty Dollars
($50.00) for an 8-year card; however, no person sixty-five (65)
years of age or older, or a one hundred percent (100%) disabled
Req. No. 10328 Page 4

vete ran described in subsection P of Section 6-101 of this title,
shall be charged a fee for an identification card. Of each fee
charged pursuant to the provisions of this subsection:
1. Seven Dollars ($7.00) of a 4-year card and Fourteen Dollars
($14.00) of an 8-year card shall be apportioned as provided in
Section 1104 of this title;
2. Three Dollars ($3.00) of a 4-year card and Six Dollars
($6.00) of an 8-year card shall be credited to the Department of
Public Safety Computer Imaging System Revolving Fund to be used
solely for the purpose of the administration and maintenance of the
computerized imaging system of the Department through October 31,
2022. Beginning November 1, 2022, Three Dollars ($3.00) of a 4-year
card and Six Dollars ($6.00) of an 8-year card shall be credited to
the Service Oklahoma Computer Imaging System Revolving Fund to be
used solely for the purpose of administration and maintenance of the
computerized imaging system of Service Oklahoma;
3. Ten Dollars ($10.00) of a 4-year card and Twenty Dollars
($20.00) of an 8-year card shall be deposited in the Department of
Public Safety Revolving Fund through October 31, 2022. Beginning
November 1, 2022, this fee shall be deposited in the Service
Oklahoma Revolving Fund;
4. Three Dollars ($3.00) of a 4-year card and Six Dollars
($6.00) of an 8-year card shall be deposited to the State Public
Safety Fund created in Section 2-147 of this title; and
Req. No. 10328 Page 5

5. Two Dollars ($2.00) for a 4-year card and Four Dollars
($4.00) for an 8-year card of the fee authorized by this subsection
related to the issuance or renewal of an identification card by a
licensed operator that does process approved applications or
renewals for REAL ID Compliant and REAL ID Noncompliant Driver
Licenses or Identification Cards shall be retained by the licensed
operator pursuant to subsection E of Section 1141.1 of this title.
E. The fee charged for replacement of a REAL ID Compliant
Identification Card, or REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Card,
shall be Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00); however, no person sixty-five
(65) years of age or older and no homeless person who submits proof
of temporary residence through a social worker or the coordinator of
an emergency shelter for the homeless where the person is
temporarily residing shall be charged a fee for an a 4-year
identification card replacement. No more than one 4-year
identification card replacement furnished to a homeless person
pursuant to this subsection shall be provided without a fee. For
the purposes of this section, "homeless person" means a person who
is unable to secure permanent, fixed, and stable housing as
determined by a social worker or the coordinator of an emergency
shelter for the homeless. Of each fee charged pursuant to the
provisions of this subsection:
1. Seven Dollars ($7.00) shall be apportioned as provided in
Section 1104 of this title;
Req. No. 10328 Page 6

2. Three Dollars ($3.00) shall be credited to the Department of
Public Safety Computer Imaging System Revolving Fund to be used
solely for the purpose of the administration and maintenance of the
computerized imaging system of the Department through October 31,
2022. Beginning November 1, 2022, Three Dollars ($3.00) shall be
credited to the Service Oklahoma Computer Imaging System Revolving
Fund to be used solely for the purpose of administration and
maintenance of the computerized imaging system of Service Oklahoma;
3. Ten Dollars ($10.00) shall be deposited in the Department of
Public Safety Revolving Fund through October 31, 2022. Beginning
November 1, 2022, this fee shall be deposited in the Service
Oklahoma Revolving Fund;
4. Three Dollars ($3.00) shall be deposited to the State Public
Safety Fund created in Section 2-147 of this title; and
5. Two Dollars ($2.00) of the fee authorized by this subsection
related to the replacement of an identification card by a licensed
operator that does process approved applications or renewals for
REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID Noncompliant Driver Licenses or
Identification Cards shall be retained by the licensed operator
pursuant to subsection E of Section 1141.1 of this title.
F. The Oklahoma Tax Commission is hereby authorized to
reimburse, from funds available to that agency, each licensed
operator issuing an identification card to a person sixty-five (65)
years of age or older, an amount not to exceed One Dollar ($1.00)
Req. No. 10328 Page 7

for each card or driver license so issued through June 30, 2023.
The Tax Commission shall develop procedures for claims for
reimbursement.
G. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when a person
makes an application for a new identification card, or makes
application to renew an identification card, and the person has been
convicted of, or received a deferred judgment for, any offense
required to register pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act,
the identification card shall be valid for a period of one (1) year
from the month of issuance, but may be renewed yearly during the
time the person is subject to registration on the Sex Offender
Registry. The cost for such an identification card shall be the
same as for other identification cards and renewals.
H. Nothing in this section requires or authorizes the
Department of Public Safety Service Oklahoma to issue a REAL ID
Noncompliant Identification Card without the documentation required
by the provisions of paragraph 9 of subsection A of Section 6-103 of
this title.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-325, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1-325. The State Board of Health shall prescribe the
fees to be paid for certified copies of certificates or records, or
for a search of the files or records when no copy is made.

Req. No. 10328 Page 8

The collection of such fees may be accomplished by acceptance of
cash, money orders, credit cards, organization or personal checks;
in. In the event money orders or checks are proved to be
noncollectible, neither the State Board of Health, the State
Commissioner of Health, nor any of the employees of the State
Department of Health will be held responsible and personally liable;
it. It is further required that no additional certified copies of
records may be delivered to persons on whom noncollectible drafts
remain outstanding.
A search and a verification of birth facts shall be furnished
free of charge to any person volunteering for enlistment into a
branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, upon written
request therefor by an officer of the Armed Forces representing the
interests of such person who shall be volunteering for service.
A certified copy of a birth certificate shall be furnished,
without fee, upon request by a homeless person, provided that the
person submits a request through a social worker or the coordinator
of an emergency shelter for the homeless where the person is
temporarily residing. The request shall be submitted on the
emergency shelter's letterhead and shall include the shelter's
employer identification number and an attestation by the coordinator
that the person requesting the birth certificate is currently
homeless and residing at the shelter, or the request shall be
submitted on the social worker's agency or professional practice
Req. No. 10328 Page 9

lett erhead and shall include the agency's or the professional
practice's employer identification number and an attestation by the
social worker that the person requesting the birth certificate is
currently homeless. A certified copy of a birth certificate
furnished pursuant to this paragraph shall be submitted to the
social worker or coordinator who submitted the request. No more
than one certified copy of a birth certificate furnished to a
homeless person pursuant to this paragraph shall be provided without
a fee. For the purposes of this section, "homeless person" means a
person who is unable to secure permanent, fixed, and stable housing
as determined by a social worker or the coordinator of an emergency
shelter for the homeless.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10328 TKR 12/12/24









Req. No. 10328 Page 10